Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5251.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-12 of the General Laws entitled "Rights and Duties of Teachers
Generally" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-12-3.2. Moment of silence on September 11.
On every September 11 in all grades in all public schools, a building administrator or a
teacher may allow a brief moment of silence to be observed in memory of the tragic events of
September 11, 2001.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001035/SUB A
========